Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-1839
Committee; payments for legal representation; when.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 81-1836 to 81-1838, the committee
shall make payments from the Victim's Compensation Fund to
any person accused of crime upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction
after a showing by such person that such money shall be used for the exclusive
purpose of retaining legal representation at any stage of the proceedings
against such person, including the appeals process.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 39;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 36;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 15.